Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 1 General Provisions
25-1-113. Processing of requests for payments submitted to state agencies.

As used in this section, “state agency” means any department, agency, board, commission, office, or other authority of the state.

A state agency that receives a properly prepared request for payment from a city or county owed payment for services or goods purchased by the state agency has twenty (20) working days to process the payment request, excluding time required for transmittal from one (1) person to another, if:

The request for payment conforms with the provisions of the contract award and the laws of the State of Arkansas; and

Funds are available.

If a state agency contests the payment, then within the time specified for processing payment it shall notify the city or county that submitted the request:

That the payment has been contested; and

The reasons for the request's being contested.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall establish procedures for monitoring payments to cities and counties by state agencies.

A description of the data the unit of government or agency collects on its website and how the data will be used by the unit of government or agency;

The type of data and the purposes for which data are shared with other entities;

Whether the unit of government's or agency's data collecting and sharing practices are mandatory or allow a browser to opt in or opt out of those practices;

An explanation that certain information collected by the governmental unit or agency is subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.;

A link to or instructions for locating the website's policy reference file, which shall identify the uniform resource locator for the website's policy statements and shall indicate those portions of the website and the website's “cookies” that are covered by each statement; and

A link to the website's human-readable privacy policy.

The Board of Examiners in Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology; and

The State Board of Optometry.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (d).

A state agency;

The Governor;

The Lieutenant Governor;

The Attorney General;

The Secretary of State;

The Auditor of State;

The Treasurer of State;

The Commissioner of State Lands;

The General Assembly; and

A committee or subcommittee of the General Assembly, including without limitation the Legislative Council; and

“State agency” means every department, division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state, including state-supported institutions of higher education.

A state agency required by Arkansas law to file a report, including without limitation a written report, with an entity of the state shall:

This subdivision shall not apply if information within the report is protected from public disclosure by state or federal law.

(1)As used in this section, “Arkansas red counties” means those counties in which Arkansans who were born and are living have a life expectancy rate six (6) to ten (10) times less than the life expectancy of Arkansans who were born and are living in the county with the highest life expectancy.

Arkansas;

Chicot;

Crittenden;

Cross;

Dallas;

Desha;

Fulton;

Jackson;

Jefferson;

Mississippi;

Monroe;

Ouachita;

Perry;

Phillips;

Poinsett;

St. Francis;

Sevier;

Union; and

Woodruff.

The General Assembly finds:

(1)Each state agency, board, and commission that receives state dollars or tobacco settlement funds intended to improve the quality of health in Arkansas is encouraged to provide its programs, services, and research in Arkansas red counties.

Arkansas Center for Health Improvement;

Division of Environmental Quality;

Department of Health;

Donald W. Reynolds Institute on Aging at the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

Area Agencies on Aging;

Arkansas Biosciences Institute of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

Fay W. Boozman College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences; and

Partners for Inclusive Communities of the University Centers of Excellence in Developmental Disabilities Education, Research, and Service of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences.

(A)The entities listed in subdivision (c)(2) of this section shall submit an annual report to the chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, the chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor, and the Governor to be delivered on or before October 1 of each year.

The annual report required under subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this section shall include without limitation a section that:

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(2)(B) and (d)(3).

Describes services, programs, research, or any combination of services, programs, and research provided in the Arkansas red counties during the previous fiscal years;

Accounts for expenditures, services, programs, research, or any combination of services, programs, and research provided in the Arkansas red counties during the previous fiscal year; and

Provides recommendations toward improving health and healthcare in Arkansas red counties.

The following entities shall work together to identify the red counties most in need of help with mortality disparities and shall make that data available to the public:

(1)As used in this section, “Arkansas red counties” means those counties in which Arkansans were born and are living have a life expectancy rate six to ten (6-10) years less than the life expectancy of Arkansans who were born and are living in the county with the highest life expectancy.

Arkansas;

Chicot;

Crittenden;

Cross;

Dallas;

Desha;

Fulton;

Jackson;

Jefferson;

Mississippi;

Monroe;

Ouachita;

Perry;

Phillips;

Poinsett;

St. Francis;

Sevier;

Union; and

Woodruff.

The General Assembly finds that:

The circumstances in which people are born, grow up, live, work, and age;

Systems for dealing with illness and access to those systems; and

Other factors, such as poverty, substance abuse, working conditions, unemployment, social support, nutritious foods, transportation, and housing;

Complex factors affecting health operate at the levels of individuals, interpersonal networks, organizations, or communities that influence disparities in health and healthcare; and

Collaboration between agencies and organizations is cost effective, increases awareness, and ensures programs and services provided are comprehensive.

(1)Each state agency, board, and commission whose scope of services encompasses the Arkansas red counties to date are encouraged to work collaboratively in the Arkansas red counties to implement strategies that may include without limitation health screenings, education, awareness, outreach efforts, resource and service navigation, as well as other health and health care access-related initiatives toward achieving systems change.

The Arkansas Center for Health Improvement;

The Arkansas Minority Health Commission;

The Division of Environmental Quality;

The Department of Health;

Fay W. Boozman College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;

Workforce Development Commission [repealed];

Division of Higher Education;

Arkansas Department of Transportation;

University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences — Partners for Inclusive Communities;

Arkansas Children's Hospital;

University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences — Area Health Education Centers;

Public safety organizations;

Arkansas Optometric Association, Inc.; and

Area Agencies on Aging.

(1)The Office of Minority Health and Health Disparities is designated to:

Organize, notify, and coordinate planning meetings of the entities encouraged under this section to work together to plan, operate, and coordinate a comprehensive initiative to address the health and healthcare needs of the Arkansas red counties;

Coordinate agreed-upon initiatives in selected counties annually;

Assist in development of a standardized annual report format that will be used to report on the cross-sector comprehensive collaborative initiatives and the outcomes of those initiatives; and

Compile an annual report of comprehensive collaborative initiatives using the standardized format created under this subsection and submit the report to the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor no later than October 1 of each year.

The first planning meeting under this subsection shall be held no later than October 1, 2011.

The first report under this subsection shall be submitted by October 1, 2012.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (c)(2)(H).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(2)(C); and substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Higher Education” in (c)(2)(G).

As used in this section, “public funds” means any funds, moneys, receivables, grants, investments, instruments, real or personal property, or other assets, liabilities, equities, revenues, receipts, or disbursements belonging to, held by, or passed through an entity of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

A building, structure, or facility paid for in whole or in part with public funds shall not be named for an individual living at the time of completion of the building, structure, or facility who, in the ten (10) years preceding the construction of the public building, structure, or facility:

A municipal airport paid for in whole or in part with public funds shall not be named for an individual living at the time the municipal airport is named, if the individual:

This section shall not apply to:

Who is or has been a prisoner of war; or

Who is:

At least seventy-five (75) years of age; and

Retired; or

This section shall not be construed to prevent an entity receiving public funds from placing an individual's name upon a commemorative object, including without limitation a brick, used in a building, structure, airport, or facility, in exchange for a donation to the entity.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 1225, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds:

“(1)The integrity of elections in this state is of the utmost importance; and

“(2)The General Assembly should pursue legislative measures that prevent incumbent candidates from having special or unfair advantages in subsequent political contests.

“(b)The intent of this section is to regulate the naming of public buildings, structures, or facilities after certain individuals to prevent unfair advantages for incumbent candidates in future political contests.”

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “airports” in the section heading; inserted (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and inserted “airport” throughout (d) and (e).

An agency, department, board, commission, division, office, bureau, council, authority, or other instrumentality of the State of Arkansas, including the offices of the various Arkansas-elected constitutional officers and the General Assembly and its agencies, bureaus, and divisions;

A state-supported college, university, technical college, community college, or other institution of higher education or department, division, or agency of a state institution of higher education;

The Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, the Administrative Office of the Courts, the circuit courts, and the prosecuting attorneys' offices;

An office, department, commission, council, agency, board, bureau, committee, corporation, or other instrumentality of a county government or a municipality or a district court, a county subordinate service district, a municipally owned utility, or a regional or joint governing body of one (1) or more counties or municipalities; or

A public school district, school, or an office or department of a public school district in Arkansas.

Choose to be responsible for the payment of any fee associated with the state criminal background check; or

Provide that the applicant is responsible for the payment of any fee associated with the criminal background check.

Upon completion of the criminal background check, the bureau shall forward to the public employer all releasable information obtained concerning the applicant.

As used in this section:

An agency, department, board, commission, division, office, bureau, council, authority, or other instrumentality of the State of Arkansas, including the offices of the various Arkansas-elected constitutional officers and the General Assembly and its agencies, bureaus, and divisions;

A state-supported college, university, technical college, community college, or other institution of higher education or department, division, or agency of a state institution of higher education;

The Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, the Administrative Office of the Courts, the circuit courts, and the prosecuting attorneys' offices;

An office, department, commission, council, agency, board, bureau, committee, corporation, or other instrumentality of a county government or a municipality or a district court, a county subordinate service district, a municipally-owned utility, or a regional or joint governing body of one (1) or more counties or municipalities; or

A public school district, school, or an office or department of a public school district in Arkansas.

(1)A public employee with supervisory fiduciary responsibility over all fiscal matters of a public employer shall report to Arkansas Legislative Audit a loss of public funds that amounts to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in one (1) calendar year, including without limitation:

Apparent unauthorized disbursements of public funds; or

The apparent theft or misappropriation of public funds or property.

A report under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be made within five (5) business days of the date the public employee learns of the loss of public funds.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “to Arkansas Legislative Audit a loss of public funds that amounts to one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more in one (1) calendar year” for “a loss of public funds to Arkansas Legislative Audit” in (b)(1).

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, No. 1405, § 57: Apr. 9, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the people of the State of Arkansas overwhelmingly approved the establishment of lotteries at the 2008 General Election; that the Eighty-seventh General Assembly adopted Acts 605 and 606 of 2009 that implemented lotteries and made corresponding revisions to the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; that this bill amends provisions of Acts 605 and 606 of 2009 pertaining to lotteries and the Arkansas Academic Challenge Scholarship Program; and that the failure to immediately implement this act will cause a reduction in lottery proceeds that will harm the educational and economic success of potential students eligible to receive scholarships under the act. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a); and deleted “unsolicited” preceding “state agency reports” in (b).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added the (a) designation and made stylistic changes; and added (b).

A public employee with supervisory fiduciary responsibility over all fiscal matters who purposely fails to comply with subsection (b) of this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

It is not the intent of the General Assembly to reduce the free flow of information between state government and the public. Rather, the intent is to reduce the use of state government publications for other than required informational purposes and to effect a reduction in the escalating public expense of writing, printing, and distributing state agency reports.

Reports by state agencies that are required to be submitted to the General Assembly shall be submitted only to:

A report required to be submitted to the General Assembly shall be filed in electronic form.

A state agency shall not distribute a state publication except as provided in this section.

(1)A state agency shall place a state publication on its website.

Upon request, a state agency shall provide an unbound, black-and-white copy of a state publication to a person.

(1)A state agency shall compile a mailing list of persons requesting publications distributed by the state agency.

The card shall include the address of the website on which the publication is located.

Upon return receipt of a card, the state agency shall then send a copy of the publication to the person.

This section does not apply to the following publications:

Publications that are applications, instructions, or guidelines for complying with state or federal law, regulation, or policy;

Publications of the Division of Agriculture of the University of Arkansas;

Information, forms, and notices necessary to comply with state tax laws, driver's licensing laws, and motor vehicle registration and titling laws;

Financial reports required by a:

Governing board if the rules, procedures, or bylaws of the governing board as of January 1, 2013, required a printed financial report;

Bond rating agency;

Bond trustee; or

Financial institution; and

The Arkansas Highways magazine published by the Arkansas Department of Transportation.

A state agency may distribute upon request an abstract that contains a description of reports submitted to the General Assembly and of any other information that is available.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(3) of this section, on or before October 1 of each even-numbered year a state agency shall submit an electronic report to the Department of Finance and Administration containing the:

Number of unbound, black-and-white publications the state agency distributed under this section in the past two (2) years; and

The cost of producing the unbound, black-and-white publications distributed under this section in the past two (2) years.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall provide a report containing the information reported by state agencies under subdivision (g)(1) of this section by November 1 of each even-numbered year.

The report shall identify the number of publications distributed and the cost of producing the publications for each individual state agency reporting under subdivision (g)(1) of this section.

Subdivision (g)(1) of this section does not apply to the General Assembly or the divisions, commissions, and bureaus operating under the authority of the General Assembly.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Department of Transportation” for “State Highway and Transportation Department” in (e)(10).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Information Systems” for “Department of Information Systems” in (b)(2).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1710, § 1.

25-1-114. Incorporation of machine-readable privacy policies into websites.

Each unit of state and local government and each state agency that operates or maintains a website shall incorporate a machine-readable privacy policy into each of its websites no later than July 1, 2004.

The privacy policy statement shall be published on the state's website, local government's website, or state agency's website and for each statement shall include:

History.

Acts 2003, No. 1713, § 1.

25-1-115. Contact information on state agency documents.

The purpose of this section is to require each state agency to include a telephone number for inquiries or comments and, to the extent practicable, the name of a contact person on any communication, form, notice, announcement, publication, or other similar document from the state agency.

This section shall not apply to communications, forms, notices, announcements, publications, or other similar documents in existence on August 12, 2005, but shall apply to such documents as they are created, revised, and reordered after August 12, 2005.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2263, § 1.

25-1-116. State agency personal computer policy.

As used in this section, “state agency” means any department, agency, board, commission, office, or other authority of the state.

The chief administrative officer of each state agency shall promulgate a policy that prohibits the integration of hardware, software, or peripherals owned by an authorized user with a state agency's network or workstation without the approval of the state agency's chief administrative officer or his or her designee.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 339, § 1.

25-1-117. Demographic data report.

A state agency, board, or commission that licenses or otherwise regulates a health profession shall procure demographic data regarding the health care workforce in this state, including without limitation:

The Arkansas Board of Podiatric Medicine;

The Arkansas Psychology Board;

The Arkansas Social Work Licensing Board;

The Arkansas State Board of Dental Examiners;

The Arkansas State Medical Board;

The Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy;

Each state agency, board, or commission required to procure data under this section shall procure accurate and efficient collection of data, demographic, and other information by defining the following categories on licensure applications, including without limitation:

Age;

City and county of residence;

Educational institution of professional education and training;

Ethnicity;

Gender;

Place of birth; and

Race.

Each state agency, board, or commission required to procure data under this section shall report the data on or before August 31 each year to:

The Arkansas Center for Health Improvement;

The Arkansas Minority Health Commission; and

The Department of Health.

If collected via licensure applications or through other means, each state agency, board, or commission listed in subsection (a) of this section shall report the following information in accordance with subsection (c) of this section:

Licensee name;

Licensure number;

Licensure status;

Original date of full licensure in Arkansas;

National Provider Identifier;

Location of practice, including zip code, city, and county of practice; and

Any specialty designation and board certifications.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 1489, § 1; 2017, No. 970, § 1.

25-1-118. Electronic filing of reports.

As used in this section:

“Entity of the state” means:

File the report in electronic form; and

(A)Post the report on its Internet website, if applicable.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 742, § 1.

25-1-119. Services and studies concerning mortality disparities — Definition.

“Arkansas red counties” includes on July 27, 2011:

It is unacceptable for Arkansans born and living in one part of the state to have a life expectancy rate six to ten (6-10) years less than Arkansans born and living in another part of the state;

Complex factors operating at the levels of individuals, interpersonal networks, organizations, or communities influence disparities in health and healthcare; and

Health and healthcare disparities not only are unacceptable, but also have human, economic, social, and developmental costs that affect all residents of the nation and the State of Arkansas.

Identified agencies, boards, and commissions whose scope of services encompasses the Arkansas red counties include without limitation, the:

The Arkansas Center for Health Improvement;

The Arkansas Minority Health Commission;

The Division of Environmental Quality;

The Department of Health; and

Fay W. Boozman College of Public Health of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 790, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3245, 3246.

25-1-120. Comprehensive cross-sector collaboration — Definition.

“Arkansas red counties” includes on July 27, 2011:

Health is affected by a wide variety of social factors, including without limitation:

The following entities without limitation are encouraged to work together to plan, operate, and coordinate a comprehensive initiative to address the health and healthcare needs of the Arkansas red counties:

History.

Acts 2011, No. 798, § 1; 2017, No. 707, §
285; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3247, 3248.

25-1-121. Naming of public buildings, structures, airports, or facilities — Definition.

Was elected by qualified electors to a federal, state, county, or municipal office or held a federal, state, county, or municipal office; and

Received a salary for his or her service in the federal, state, county, or municipal office.

Was elected by qualified electors to a federal, state, county, or municipal office or held a federal, state, county, or municipal office; and

Received a salary for his or her service in the federal, state, county, or municipal office.

A building, structure, airport, or facility that concerns an individual living at the time of completion of the building, structure, or facility and has historical significance, including without limitation that individual's birthplace;

The naming of a building, structure, airport, or facility after an individual:

A building, structure, airport, or facility for which at least fifty percent (50%) of the funds used to pay for the building, structure, airport, or facility are private funds.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1225, § 2; 2017, No. 983, § 1.

25-1-122. Alternative or secondary address for state communications through the mail — Law enforcement officers.

A person who is employed primarily as a law enforcement officer may elect to use an alternative or secondary address, such as a post office box, to receive all of his or her communications sent by a state agency through the mail.

The secondary or alternative address must be in the same county and, where practicable, same voting precinct as the law enforcement officer's primary place of residence.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1514, § 1.

25-1-123. Criminal background checks for public employees controlling public funds — Definition.

As used in this section, “public employer” means any of the following:

(1)A public employer shall obtain a state criminal background check to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police before finalizing the hiring of an applicant for an employment position with supervisory fiduciary responsibility over all fiscal matters.

The applicant shall sign a release of information to the public employer.

The public employer may:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1103, § 5.

25-1-124. Reporting by public employee — Definitions.

“Public employee” means a person who performs a full or part-time service for wages, salary, or other remuneration for a public employer; and

“Public employer” means any of the following:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1103, § 5; 2017, No. 498, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Paper Reduction

25-1-201. Legislative intent.

Prohibit the excessive reproduction of state agency reports that are being written, printed, and distributed at significant public expense; and

Provide for Internet publication as the primary means of publishing state agency reports.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1276, § 1; 2013, No. 501, § 4.

25-1-202. Distribution of reports to the General Assembly.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives;

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

The member of the General Assembly who was the lead sponsor of the legislation authorizing the preparation of the report; and

The Director of the Bureau of Legislative Research.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1276, § 2; 2013, No. 501, § 5.

25-1-203. Distribution of other publications.

The Division of Information Systems shall assist those state agencies requesting assistance in placing publications on the state agency's website.

(A)Before distributing a state publication, the state agency shall send by mail a card to each person on the mailing list requesting the person to return the card to the state agency if the person wishes to receive an unbound, black-and-white copy of the publication.

Public information pamphlets;

Promotional brochures;

Copies of legislative bills;

Copies of statutes, laws, and rules;

Information disseminated to the press or requested pursuant to the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.;

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1276, § 3; 2013, No. 501, § 6; 2017, No. 707, §
286; 2019, No. 315, § 2906; 2019, No. 910, § 6254.

25-1-204. Publications to be included in agency budget.

Each state agency shall include in its budget request a list of state publications that are required by statutory law and shall state in writing the reasons for the continued publication or distribution of its publications.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1276, § 4; 2013, No. 501, § 7.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “Each” for “Beginning with the 1999-2000 fiscal year, each.”

25-1-205. Copies to be filed with Legislative Council.

A state agency which publishes or distributes a state publication shall file an electronic copy of a publication with the Legislative Council if the state agency has published or distributed more than one thousand (1,000) copies of the publication in the preceding calendar year.

This section shall not apply to:

Copies of legislative bills;

Copies of statutes, laws, and rules;

Information disseminated solely to the press;

Publications that are applications, instructions, or guidelines for complying with any state or federal law, rule, regulation, or policy;

Promotional brochures and educational materials published by the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism;

Publications of the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service; and

Marketing and promotional information published by the Arkansas Economic Development Commission.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added the (a) designation; in (a), substituted “A” for “Any”, substituted “an electronic copy of a publication” for “a copy of the publication”; inserted the (b) designation; and substituted “Economic Development Commission” for “Department of Economic Development” in (b)(7).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b)(2); and inserted “rule” in (b)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (b)(5).

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1276, § 5; 2013, No. 501, § 8; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2907, 2908; 2019, No. 910, § 5701.

25-1-206. Definition of “state agency”.

As used in this subchapter, “state agency” means an agency, authority, board, bureau, commission, council, department, office, or officer of the state receiving an appropriation by the General Assembly, including without limitation a state-supported institution of higher education.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1276, § 6; 2009, No. 1405, § 50; 2013, No. 501, § 9.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2013 amendment rewrote the section.

Subchapter 3

— Members of Executive Branch Boards and Commissions

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 1414, § 6: Apr. 13, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Arkansas Supreme Court has ruled that service by members of the General Assembly on executive branch boards and commissions which exercise the sovereign powers of this state is unconstitutional; that this act will avoid further litigation and cure uncertainty as to whether service on the several boards and commissions constitutes unconstitutional service; and that this act should go into effect immediately in order to settle the issue without further litigation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2003, No. 1473, § 74: July 1, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act includes technical corrects to Act 923 of 2003 which establishes the classification and compensation levels of state employees covered by the provisions of the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act; that Act 923 of 2003 will become effective on July 1, 2003; and that to avoid confusion this act must also effective on July 1, 2003. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2003.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 129: May 23, 2016. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the membership and duties of certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commissions and repeals other governmental entities; that these revisions and repeals of governmental entities impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the provisions of this act should become effective as soon as possible to allow for implementation of the new provisions in advance of the upcoming fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2017, No. 776, § 2: Jan. 1, 2018.

25-1-301. Legislative intent.

In recognition of the Supreme Court's decision in State Bd. of Workforce Educ. and Career Opportunities v. King, 336 Ark. 409, 985 S.W.2d 731 (1999), it is the intent of this subchapter to replace all legislator members of executive branch boards and commissions with appointees who are not members of the Senate or House of Representatives.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1414, § 1.